Texas statutes.
ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGE CODE

TITLE 3. LICENSES AND PERMITS

SUBTITLE B. LICENSES

Text of chapter effective on September 1, 2021

CHAPTER 73. MALT BEVERAGE AGENT

Sec. 73.01. AUTHORIZED ACTIVITIES. (a) Subject to the limitations imposed in Section 73.011 or elsewhere in this code, a person acting as an employee or representative of a licensed brewer of malt beverages located inside or outside the state or as an employee or representative of a licensed distributor may:

(1) promote the sale of malt beverages through methods such as solicitation, display, advertising, and personal contact with licensed retailers of malt beverages and their agents, servants, and employees, and with consumers of malt beverages; and

(2) sell malt beverages and offer them for sale.

(b) A person acting as a malt beverage agent may represent only one permitted or licensed business at a time while soliciting or taking orders.

Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 488, ch. 194, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1977. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 934, Sec. 57, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1359 (H.B. 1545), Sec. 255(a), eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1359 (H.B. 1545), Sec. 255(b), eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 73.011. LIMITATIONS ON AUTHORITY OF MALT BEVERAGE AGENT. (a) A person who is an employee or agent of a brewer's licensee or a nonresident brewer's licensee may not represent that the person is the agent of or is acting on behalf of a licensed distributor. A malt beverage agent may not engage in conduct that is prohibited by Section 102.75 or other provisions of this code.

(b) A malt beverage agent may not make a representation, solicitation, or offer that this code or the rules of the commission prohibits the agent's employer from offering, making, or fulfilling.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 934, Sec. 58, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1359 (H.B. 1545), Sec. 256(a), eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1359 (H.B. 1545), Sec. 256(b), eff. September 1, 2021.